Washington statutes.
RCW 33.08.040

Bylaws.

The incorporators shall prepare bylaws for the government of the association, which shall include:

(1) The offices of the association and the respective duties assigned to them;

(2) Policies and procedures for the conduct of the business of the association;

(3) Any other matters deemed necessary or expedient.

Such bylaws must conform in all respects to the provisions of this title and the laws of this state.

[ 1982 c 3 s 15; 1945 c 235 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-124. Prior: 1933 c 183 s 5; 1919 c 169 s 1; 1913 c 110 s 2; 1890 p 56 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.